Vermont, session 2025-2026, H200.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4017 is amended to read:
§ 4017. PERSONS PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING FIREARMS;
CONVICTION OF VIOLENT CRIME
(a) A person shall not possess a firearm if the person has been convicted of
a violent crime.
(b) A person who violates this section shall:
VT LEG #378711 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.200
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1) for a first offense, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined
not more than $1,000.00, or both; or
(2) for a second or subsequent offense, be imprisoned not more than
three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(c) This section shall not apply to a person who is exempt from federal
firearms restrictions under 18 U.S.C. § 925(c).
(d) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Firearm” means:
(i) any weapon (including a starter gun) that will or is designed to
or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;
(ii) the frame or receiver of any such weapon; or
(iii) any firearm muffler or firearm silencer.
(B) “Firearm” shall not include an antique firearm.
(2) “Antique firearm” means:
(A) Any firearm (including any firearm with a matchlock, flintlock,
percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system) manufactured in or before
1898.
(B) Any replica of any firearm described in subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (2) if the replica:
(i) is not designed or redesigned for using rimfire or conventional
centerfire fixed ammunition; or
VT LEG #378711 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.200
2025 Page 3 of 7
(ii) uses rimfire or conventional centerfire fixed ammunition that
is no longer manufactured in the United States and that is not readily available
in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.
(C) Any muzzle loading rifle, muzzle loading shotgun, or muzzle
loading pistol that is designed to use black powder or a black powder substitute
and that cannot use fixed ammunition. As used in this subdivision (C),
“antique firearm” shall not include a weapon that incorporates a firearm frame
or receiver, a firearm that is converted into a muzzle loading weapon, or any
muzzle loading weapon that can be readily converted to fire fixed ammunition
by replacing the barrel, bolt, breechblock, or any combination thereof.
(3) “Violent crime” means:
(A)(i) A listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title
other than:
(I) lewd or lascivious conduct as defined in section 2601 of this
title;
(II) recklessly endangering another person as defined in section
1025 of this title;
(III) operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other
substance with either death or serious bodily injury resulting as defined in 23
V.S.A. § 1210(f) and (g);
VT LEG #378711 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.200
2025 Page 4 of 7
(IV) careless or negligent operation resulting in serious bodily
injury or death as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1091(b);
(V) leaving the scene of an accident resulting in serious bodily
injury or death as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1128(b) or (c); or
(VI) a misdemeanor violation of chapter 28 of this title, relating
to abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults; or
(ii) a comparable offense and sentence in another jurisdiction if
the offense prohibits the person from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. §
922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(20).
(B) An offense involving sexual exploitation of children in violation
of chapter 64 of this title, or a comparable offense and sentence in another
jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the person from possessing a firearm under
18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(20).
(C) A violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4231(b)(2), (b)(3), or (c) (selling,
dispensing, or trafficking cocaine); 4232(b)(2) or (b)(3) (selling or dispensing
LSD); 4233(b)(2), (b)(3), or (c) (selling, dispensing, or trafficking heroin);
4234(b)(2) or (b)(3) (selling or dispensing depressants, stimulants, and
narcotics); 4234a(b)(2), (b)(3), or (c) (selling, dispensing, or trafficking
methamphetamine); 4235(c)(2) or (c)(3) (selling or dispensing hallucinogenic
drugs); 4235a(b)(2) or (b)(3) (selling or dispensing Ecstasy), or a comparable
offense and sentence in another jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the person
VT LEG #378711 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.200
2025 Page 5 of 7
from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C. §
921(a)(20).
(D) A conviction of possession with intent to distribute a controlled
substance other than cannabis in another jurisdiction if the offense prohibits the
person from possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(1) or 18 U.S.C.
§ 921(a)(20).
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 4017a is amended to read:
§ 4017a. FUGITIVES FROM JUSTICE; PERSONS SUBJECT TO FINAL
RELIEF FROM ABUSE OR STALKING ORDER; PERSONS
CHARGED WITH CERTAIN OFFENSES; PROHIBITION ON
POSSESSION OF FIREARMS
(a) A person shall not possess a firearm if the person:
(1) is a fugitive from justice;
(2) is the subject of a final relief from abuse order issued pursuant to
15 V.S.A. § 1103;
(3) is the subject of a final order against stalking issued pursuant to
12 V.S.A. § 5133 if the order prohibits the person from possessing a firearm;
or
(4) is a person against whom charges are pending for:
(A) carrying a dangerous weapon while committing a felony in
violation of section 4005 of this title;
VT LEG #378711 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.200
2025 Page 6 of 7
(B) trafficking a regulated drug in violation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1; or
(C) human trafficking or aggravated human trafficking in violation of
section 2652 or 2653 of this title; or
(5)(A)(i) has been found by the court to be a person in need of treatment
pursuant to section 4822 of this title; or
(ii) has been the subject of a hospitalization order issued by the
court pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 7617(b)(1) or (2) or a nonhospitalization order
issued by the court pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 7617(b)(3).
(B) This subdivision (5) shall not apply to a person if the Family
Division grants a petition for relief from firearms disability for the person
pursuant to section 4825 of this title.
(b) A person who violates this section shall:
(1) for a first offense, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined
not more than $1,000.00, or both; or
(2) for a second or subsequent offense, be imprisoned not more than
three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in section 4017 of this title.
(2) “Fugitive from justice” means a person who has fled to avoid
prosecution for a crime or to avoid giving testimony in a criminal proceeding.
VT LEG #378711 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.200
2025 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378711 v.1